Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-1253
Enforcement of registered determination.

(a) A court of this state may grant any relief normally available under the law of this state to enforce a registered child custody determination made by a court of another state.

(b) A court of this state shall recognize and enforce, but may not modify, except in accordance with sections 43-1238 to 43-1247, a registered child custody determination of a court of another state.

Laws 2003, LB 148, § 28.